Mississippi statutes. Title 31. Public Business, Bonds and Obligations
Chapter 21. Registered Bonds

§ 31-21-1.
Citation of chapter.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Registered Bond Act.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 494, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 11, 1983).

§ 31-21-3.
Definitions.

As used herein, the following words and terms shall have the following meanings, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context:

“Act” means this Registered Bond Act;

“Bonds” means any bonds, interim certificates, notes or other evidences of indebtedness;

“Law” means any law or statute of this state, whether general, special, private or local;

“Political subdivision” means any county, municipality, governmental district or unit, instrumentality of the state, public corporation, body corporate, commission, board, agency, authority, public body, politic or other public entity authorized by any law to issue bonds; and

“State” means the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 494, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 11, 1983).

§ 31-21-5.
Additional powers granted in connection with issuance of bonds.

Notwithstanding any law or any provision of any law to the contrary, the following additional and supplemental powers and authorizations are hereby granted to the state and each political subdivision in connection with the issuance of any bonds:

Such bonds may be issued in fully registered or book-entry form;

All signatures and seals appearing on such bonds as required or permitted by law may be facsimile signatures and seals;

Such bonds may be made subject to such authentication, registration, transfer and payment provisions as shall be set forth in the proceedings authorizing such bonds and the same may be made in such manner as shall be provided in such proceedings;

The State Treasurer, the chancery clerk of the county or the chancery clerk of the county in which the political subdivision is located or has its principal office may act as registrar, paying agent, transfer agent, agent for the delivery and payment of such bonds, authenticating agent or otherwise, and the State Treasurer may collect a reasonable fee from the political subdivision for rendering such services;

Banks and trust companies located either within or without the state may be appointed to act as registrars, paying agents, transfer agents, depositories for safekeeping, agents for the delivery and payment of such bonds, authenticating agents or otherwise, and agreements may be entered into with such banks and trust companies with respect to such duties and payment therefor;

Any agreements to be entered into pursuant to paragraph (e) above may be negotiated without the necessity of competitive bids, and any payments to be made pursuant to such agreements may be made from the proceeds of the bonds to which such agreements apply or from any other moneys legally available therefor; and

All things may be done regarding the form, execution, authentication, transfer and payment of such bonds which may be helpful in assuring compliance with any federal law applicable to such bonds or the interest income thereon and in assuring that such bonds will be readily acceptable in the municipal bond market, provided the same is not inconsistent with the constitution of the state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 494, § 4; Laws, 1987, ch. 431, eff from and after October 1, 1987.

§ 31-21-7.
Construction of chapter.

This chapter shall be construed to be supplemental and additional to any powers conferred by other laws on the state or any political subdivision and not in derogation of any such powers now existing.

This chapter is remedial in nature and shall be liberally construed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 494, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 11, 1983).